Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 105. PARTNERSHIPS AND JOINT STOCK COMPANIES

CHAPTER 2. UNINCORPORATED JOINT STOCK COMPANIES

Art. 6133. SUIT IN COMPANY NAME. Any unincorporated joint stock company or association, whether foreign or domestic, doing business in this State, may sue or be sued in any court of this State having jurisdiction of the subject matter in its company or distinguishing name; and it shall not be necessary to make the individual stockholders or members thereof parties to the suit.

Acts 1907, p. 240.

Art. 6134. SERVICE OF CITATION. In suits against such companies or associations, service of citation may be had on the president, secretary, treasurer or general agent of such unincorporated companies.

Acts 1907, p. 240.

Art. 6135. JUDGMENT. In suits by or against such unincorporated companies, whatever judgment shall be rendered shall be as conclusive on the individual stockholders and members thereof as if they were individually parties to such suits.

Acts 1907, p. 240.

Art. 6136. JOINT LIABILITY. Where suit shall be brought against such company or association, and the only service had shall be upon the president, secretary, treasurer or general agent of such company or association, and judgment shall be rendered against the defendant company, such judgment shall be binding on the joint property of all the stockholders or members thereof, and may be enforced by execution against the joint property; but such judgment shall not be binding on the individual property of the stockholders or members, nor authorize execution against it.

Acts 1907, p. 240.

Art. 6137. INDIVIDUAL LIABILITY. In a suit against such company or association, in addition to service on the president, secretary, treasurer or general agent of such companies or association, service of citation may also be had on any and all of the stockholders or members of such companies or associations; and, in the event judgment shall be against such unincorporated company or association, it shall be equally binding upon the individual property of the stockholders or members so served, and executions may issue against the property of the individual stockholders or members, as well as against the joint property; but executions shall not issue against the individual property of the stockholders or members until execution against the joint property has been returned without satisfaction.

Acts 1907, p. 240.

Art. 6138. THIS CHAPTER CUMULATIVE. The provisions of this chapter shall not affect nor impair the right allowed unincorporated joint stock companies and associations to sue in the individual names of the stockholders or members, nor the right of any person to sue the individual stockholders or members; but the provisions of this chapter shall be construed as cumulative merely of other remedies now existing under the law.

Acts 1907, p. 240.